Nevada, session 83, SB439.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. NRS 597.237 is hereby amended to read as follows:
597.237 1. A person may operate an estate distillery if the
person:
(a) Obtains a license for the facility pursuant to chapter 369 of
NRS;
(b) Complies with the requirements of this chapter; and
(c) Complies with any other applicable governmental
requirements.
2. A person who operates an estate distillery pursuant to this
section may:
(a) In addition to manufacturing spirits from agricultural raw
materials through distillation, blend, age, store and bottle the spirits
so manufactured. The person operating the estate distillery shall
ensure that none of the spirits manufactured at the estate distillery
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 2 –
are derived from neutral or distilled spirits manufactured by another
manufacturer, except as authorized by paragraph (b).
(b) Blend and distill wines or malt beverages, provided any such
wine or malt beverage was manufactured by:
(1) A brew pub licensed pursuant to NRS 597.230; or
(2) A winery that has been issued a wine-maker’s license
pursuant to NRS 369.200 if 25 percent or more of the wine
produced, blended or aged by the winery is produced, blended or
aged from fruit grown or honey produced in this State.
(c) Except as otherwise provided in paragraphs (g) and (h), in
any calendar year, sell and transport in Nevada not more than a
combined total of 75,000 cases of spirits at the estate distillery to a
person who holds a license to engage in business as a wholesale
dealer of liquor pursuant to chapter 369 of NRS.
(d) In any calendar year, manufacture for exportation to another
state, not more than a combined total of 400,000 cases of spirits at
all the estate distilleries the person operates.
(e) On the premises of the estate distillery, serve samples of the
spirits manufactured at the estate distillery. Any such samples must
not exceed, per person, per day, 4 fluid ounces in volume.
(f) On the premises of the estate distillery, sell [the] :
(1) The spirits manufactured at the estate distillery at retail
for consumption on or off the premises. Any such spirits sold at
retail for off-premises consumption must not exceed, per person, per
month, 1 case of spirits and not exceed, per person, per year, 6 cases
of spirits. The total amount of such spirits sold at retail for off-
premises consumption must not exceed 7,500 cases per year. Spirits
purchased on the premises of an estate distillery must not be resold
by the purchaser or any retail liquor store. A person who operates an
estate distillery shall prominently display on the premises a notice
that the resale of spirits purchased on the premises is prohibited.
(2) Alcoholic beverages not manufactured at the estate
distillery at retail if the estate distillery:
(I) Has obtained any license or permit required to sell
alcoholic beverages at retail in the jurisdiction in which the estate
distillery is located; and
(II) Complies with NRS 369.487 and 369.488.
(g) Donate for charitable or nonprofit purposes and transport
neutral or distilled spirits manufactured at the estate distillery in
accordance with the terms and conditions of a special permit for the
transportation of the neutral or distilled spirits obtained from the
Department of Taxation pursuant to subsection 4 of NRS 369.450.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 3 –
(h) Transfer in bulk neutral or distilled spirits manufactured at
the estate distillery to a supplier. Any such transfer:
(1) Is taxable only when the neutral or distilled spirits are
rectified and bottled in original packages for sale within this State
and removed from the federally bonded premises of the supplier;
and
(2) Is not a sale for the purposes of paragraph (c) or
manufacturing for exportation for the purposes of paragraph (d).
(i) Subject to the provisions of subsection 3, receive [wine] :
(1) Wine or malt beverages in bulk from a person described
in subparagraph (1) or (2) of paragraph (b), or from a wholesale
dealer of alcoholic beverages who is licensed under chapter 369 of
NRS and who is transferring such wine or malt beverages pursuant
to NRS 597.230 or 597.240, for the purpose of distillation and
blending. Wine and malt beverages so received are taxable only
when the wine and malt beverages are:
[(1)] (I) Distilled, blended or both, and bottled in original
packages for sale within this State; and
[(2)] (II) Removed from the federally bonded premises of the
estate distillery.
(2) Neutral or distilled spirits in bulk from a supplier that is
not an affiliate of the estate distillery for the purpose of storage
and bottling. Neutral or distilled spirits so received must be
segregated in a conspicuous place away from any other spirits or
alcoholic beverages on the premises of the estate distillery.
3. A person who operates an estate distillery shall not receive a
shipment of wine , [or] malt beverages [:] or neutral or distilled
spirits in bulk:
(a) Unless the person first notifies the Department of Taxation
that the distillery will receive such a shipment; and
(b) Except as authorized by paragraph (i) of subsection 2.
4. Spirits manufactured by an estate distillery pursuant to this
section may be sold in this State only after bottling in original
packages.
5. As used in this section, “affiliate” means a person who,
directly or indirectly through one or more intermediaries, controls,
is controlled by or is under common control with, a specified
person.
Sec. 2. (Deleted by amendment.)
20 ~~~~~ 25
-
83rd Session (2025)